Utah statutes.
48-3a-104.   Nature, purpose, and duration of limited liability company.

(1)  A limited liability company is an entity distinct from its member or members.

(2)  A limited liability company may have any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

(3)  A limited liability company has perpetual duration.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

